bg-BG: Материал на обвивката на балона с горещ въздух: Найлон; Полиестер; Рипстоп найлон; Друго
it: Materiale di rivestimento della mongolfiera: Nylon; Poliestere; Nylon ripstop; Altro
es: Material para la envoltura de globos aerostáticos: Nailon; Poliéster; Nailon antidesgarro (ripstop); Otro
da: Materiale til varmluftballonens kuvert: Nylon; Polyester; Ripstop-nylon; Andet
fi: Kuumailmapallon kuoren materiaali: Nailon; Polyesteri; Ripstop-nailon; Muu
lt-LT: Karšto oro baliono apvalkalo medžiaga: Nailonas; Poliesteris; Sustiprintas nailonas („Ripstop“); Kita
zh-CN: 热气球气囊材质: 尼龙; 聚酯纤维; 防撕裂尼龙; 其他
ja: 熱気球の外皮素材: ナイロン; ポリエステル; リップストップナイロン; その他
sv: Material för varmluftsballongens hölje: Nylon; Polyester; Ripstop-nylon; Övrigt
zh-TW: 熱氣球球囊材質: 尼龍; 聚酯纖維; 防撕裂尼龍; 其他
tr: Sıcak hava balonu zarf malzemesi: Naylon; Polyester; Yırtılmaz naylon; Diğer
nb: Materiale for konvolutt med varmluftsballong: Nylon; Polyester; Ripstop-nylon; Annet
sk-SK: Materiál plášťa teplovzdušného balóna: Nylón; Polyester; Ripstop nylón; Iné
ro-RO: Materialul învelișului balonului cu aer cald: Nailon; Poliester; Nailon ripstop; Altele
pt-BR: Envelope de balão de ar quente material: Nylon; Poliéster; Nylon ripstop; Outro
de: Material der Heißluftballonhülle: Nylon; Polyester; Ripstop-Nylon; Sonstiges
pt-PT: material do envelope do balão de ar quente: Nylon; Poliéster; Nylon ripstop; Outro
hu: Hőlégballon burkolat anyaga: Nejlon; Poliészter; Ripstop nejlon; Egyéb
vi: Vật liệu vỏ khinh khí cầu: Nylon; Polyester; Nylon ripstop; Khác
en: Hot air balloon envelope material: Nylon; Polyester; Ripstop nylon; Other
hr-HR: Materijal za ovojnicu balona na vrući zrak: Najlon; Poliester; Ripstop najlon; Ostalo
sl-SI: Material kupole balona na vroč zrak: Najlon; Poliester; Ripstop najlon; Drugo
ko: 열기구 외피 소재: 나일론; 폴리에스테르; 립스탑 나일론; 기타
cs: Materiál obalu horkovzdušného balónu: Nylon; Polyester; Ripstop nylon; Ostatní
fr: Matériau de l’enveloppe de la montgolfière: Nylon; Polyester; Nylon indéchirable; Autre
el: Υλικό αεροθαλάμου αερόστατου θερμού αέρα: Νάιλον; Πολυεστέρας; Νάιλον ripstop; Άλλο
ru: Материал оболочки воздушного шара: Нейлон; Полиэстер; Нейлон рипстоп; Другое
pl: Materiał powłoki balonu na ogrzane powietrze: Nylon; Poliester; Nylon typu ripstop; Inne
th: วัสดุหุ้มบอลลูนอากาศร้อน: ไนลอน; โพลีเอสเตอร์; ไนลอนริปสตอป; อื่นๆ
nl: Heteluchtballon envelop materiaal: Nylon; Polyester; Ripstop-nylon; Overig